Utah statutes.
79-5-302.   Recreational trail categories.

The division may plan and develop the following categories of recreational trails as part of the state trails system:

(1)  cross-state trails that connect scenic, natural, historic, geologic, geographic, or other significant features;

(2)  water-oriented trails that provide a path to or along lakes, streams, or reservoirs;

(3)  scenic-access trails that give access to recreation, scenic, natural, historic, or cultural areas;

(4)  urban trails that connect parks, scenic and natural areas, historical sites, and neighboring communities within a county of the first or second class; and

(5)  interpretive trails that identify:

(a)  historic routes; and

(b)  significant natural features.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

